Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2211XS (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. 77 Section 1. Section 668A.1, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. If the answer or finding pursuant to subsection 1 , 3 paragraph âbâ , is affirmative, or if the claim is against any 4 physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, 5 dentist, podiatric physician, optometrist, pharmacist, 6 chiropractor, physician assistant, or nurse, licensed under 7 chapter 147 , or a hospital licensed under chapter 135B , arising 8 out of patient care, or if the claim is part of a civil action 9 involving the operation of a commercial motor vehicle, then the 10 full amount of the punitive or exemplary damages awarded shall 11 be paid to the claimant. 12 b. If the answer or finding pursuant to subsection 1 , 13 paragraph âbâ , is negative, and if the claim is not against 14 any physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, 15 dentist, podiatric physician, optometrist, pharmacist, 16 chiropractor, physician assistant, or nurse, licensed under 17 chapter 147 , or a hospital licensed under chapter 135B , 18 arising out of patient care, and if the claim is not part of 19 a civil action involving the operation of a commercial motor 20 vehicle, then after payment of all applicable costs and fees, 21 an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent of the punitive or 22 exemplary damages awarded may be ordered paid to the claimant, 23 with the remainder of the award to be ordered paid into a 24 civil reparations trust fund administered by the state court 25 administrator. Funds placed in the civil reparations trust 26 shall be under the control and supervision of the executive 27 council, and shall be disbursed only for purposes of indigent 28 civil litigation programs or insurance assistance programs. 29 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Sections 668.12A and 668.15A, Code 2025, 30 are repealed. 31